District of Columbia statutes.
47-398.05

Limitation on amount of borrowing financed by arena tax.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of borrowing associated with the arena development and construction costs, including, but not limited to, land acquisition, construction, predevelopment, off-site infrastructure, and financing for capital interest and principal, may not exceed $61 million, to be paid from proceeds of the arena tax, established pursuant to § 47-2751 et seq.

Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1303, 43 DCR 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-398.5.